Washington statutes.
RCW 11.60.020

Petition, notice, and hearing when personal representative fails to make application.

If the personal representative fails to make such application, then any person claiming to be entitled to such performance under such contract, may present a petition setting forth the facts upon which such claim is predicated. Notice of hearing shall be in accordance with the provisions of *RCW 11.16.081.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.60.020. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 189; RRS s 1559; prior: 1891 c 155 s 41; Code 1881 s 694; 1877 p 130 s 627; 1854 p 292 s 151.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 11.16.081 was repealed by 1969 c 70 s 5.

Actions for recovery of property and on contract: RCW 11.48.090.